fst/example/english/englishguesser.foma
define C [b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|x|z];
define V [a|e|i|o|u];

define Stem [C^<3 V C^<3]+;

define GuessLexicon Stem [
                    ["+N" "+Pl"]:["^" s]           |
                    ["+N" "+Sg"]:0                 |
                    ["+V"]:0                       |
                    ["+V" "+3P" "+Sg"]:["^" s]     |
                    ["+V" "+PastPart"]:["^" e d ]  |
                    ["+V" "+PresPart"]:["^" i n g ]]  ;

define ConsonantDoubling g -> g g || _ "^" [i n g | e d ];
define EDeletion e -> 0 || _ "^" [ i n g | e d ] ;
define EInsertion [..] -> e || s | z | x | c h | s h _ "^" s ;
define YReplacement y -> i e || _ "^" s    ,, 
                    y -> i   || _ "^" e d  ;
define KInsertion [..] -> k || V c _ "^" [e d | i n g];
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

regex GuessLexicon .o. 
      ConsonantDoubling .o. 
      EDeletion .o. 
      EInsertion .o. 
      YReplacement .o. 
      KInsertion .o. 
      Cleanup;
